Utah statutes.
53-13-108.   Retirement.
Eligibility for coverage under the Public Safety Contributory Retirement
System or Public Safety Noncontributory Retirement System for persons and
political subdivisions included in this chapter is governed by Title 49,
Chapter 14, Public Safety Contributory Retirement Act, and Chapter 15, Public
Safety Noncontributory Retirement Act.
